Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.505

Vapor product tax contracts—Requirements.

(1) The governor may enter into vapor product tax contracts concerning the sale of vapor products. All vapor product tax contracts must meet the requirements for vapor product tax contracts under this section.

(2) Vapor product tax contracts must be in regard to retail sales in which Indian retailers make delivery and physical transfer of possession of the vapor products from the seller to the buyer within Indian country, and are not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers. In addition, contracts may address the legal age of sale for vapor products pursuant to section 11, chapter 15, Laws of 2019.

(3) A vapor product tax contract with a tribe must provide for a tribal vapor product tax in lieu of all state vapor product taxes and state and local sales and use taxes on sales of vapor products in Indian country by Indian retailers. The tribe may allow an exemption for sales to tribal members.

(4) Vapor product tax contracts must provide that retailers must purchase vapor products only from:

(a) Wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do business in the state of Washington;

(b) Out-of-state wholesalers or manufacturers who, although not licensed to do business in the state of Washington, agree to comply with the terms of the vapor product tax contract, are certified to the state as having so agreed, and do in fact so comply. However, the state may in its sole discretion exercise its administrative and enforcement powers over such wholesalers or manufacturers to the extent permitted by law;

(c) A tribal wholesaler that purchases only from a wholesaler or manufacturer described in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection; and

(d) A tribal manufacturer.

(5) Vapor product tax contracts must be for renewable periods of no more than eight years.

(6) Vapor product tax contracts must include provisions for compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection procedures, recordkeeping, and audit requirements.

(7) Tax revenue retained by a tribe must be used for essential government services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of vapor products and food retailers is prohibited.

(8) The vapor product tax contract may include provisions to resolve disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation.

(9) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate vapor product tax contracts to the department of revenue. The department of revenue must consult with the liquor and cannabis board during the negotiations.

(10) Information received by the state or open to state review under the terms of a contract is subject to the provisions of RCW 82.32.330.

(11) It is the intent of the legislature that the liquor and cannabis board and the department of revenue continue the division of duties and shared authority under chapter 82.25 RCW and therefore the liquor and cannabis board is responsible for enforcement activities that come under the terms of chapter 82.25 RCW.

(12) Each vapor product tax contract must include a procedure for notifying the other party that a violation has occurred, a procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred, an opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision providing for termination of the contract should the violation fail to be resolved through this process, such termination subject to mediation should the terms of the contract so allow. A contract must provide for termination of the contract if resolution of a dispute does not occur within twenty-four months from the time notification of a violation has occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time period. In addition, the contract must include provisions delineating the respective roles and responsibilities of the tribe, the department of revenue, and the liquor and cannabis board.

(13) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health, education, job services, sewer, water, environmental and land use, transportation, utility services, and economic development.

(b) "Indian country" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.24.010.

(c) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means:

(i) A retailer wholly owned and operated by an Indian tribe;

(ii) A business wholly owned and operated by a tribal member and licensed by the tribe; or

(iii) A business owned and operated by the Indian person or persons in whose name the land is held in trust.

(d) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

(e) "Vapor products" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.25.005.

[ 2019 c 445 s 302.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2019 c 445: See RCW 82.25.900 and 82.25.901.

Automatic expiration date and tax preference performance statement exemption—2019 c 445: See note following RCW 82.08.0318.